California statutes. Labor Code
(d) (1) An employee who is discharged, threatened with discharge, demoted, suspended, or in any other manner discriminated or retaliated against in the terms and conditions of employment by their employer because the employee has exercised their rights as set forth in subdivision (a) may file a complaint with the Division of Labor Standards Enforcement of the Department of Industrial Relations pursuant to Section 98.7.

(2) Notwithstanding any time limitation in Section 98.7, an employee may file a complaint with the division based upon a violation of subdivision (a) within one year from the date of occurrence of the violation.

(e) An employee may use vacation, personal leave, or compensatory time off that is otherwise available to the
 employee under the applicable terms of employment, unless otherwise provided by a collective bargaining agreement, for time taken off for a purpose specified in this section. The entitlement of any employee under this section shall not be diminished by any collective bargaining agreement term or condition.

(f) For purposes of this section, “victim” means any person who suffers direct or threatened physical, psychological, or financial harm as a result of the commission or attempted commission of a crime or delinquent act. The term “victim” also includes the person’s spouse, parent, child, sibling, or guardian.

(g) This section shall apply only to alleged actions or inactions occurring on or before December 31, 2025.

(h) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2035, and as of that date
 is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 148, Sec. 5.   (AB 406)   Effective October 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2035, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

230.7.

(a) No employer shall discharge or in any manner discriminate against an employee who is the parent or guardian of a pupil for taking time off to appear in the school of a pupil pursuant to a request made under Section 48900.1 of the Education Code, if the employee, prior to taking the time off, gives reasonable notice to the employer that he or she is requested to appear in the school. 

(b) Any employee who is discharged, threatened with discharge, demoted, suspended, or in any other manner discriminated against in the terms and conditions of employment by his or her employer because the employee has taken time off to appear in the school of a pupil pursuant to a request made under Section 48900.1 of the Education Code shall be entitled to reinstatement and reimbursement for lost wages and work benefits caused by those acts of the employer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 213, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

230.8.

(a) (1) An employer who employs 25 or more employees working at the same location shall not discharge or in any way discriminate against an employee who is a parent of one or more children of the age to attend kindergarten or grades 1 to 12, inclusive, or a licensed child care provider, for taking off up to 40 hours each year, for the purpose of either of the following
 child-related activities:

(A) To find, enroll, or reenroll his or her child in a school or with a licensed child care provider, or to participate in activities of the school or licensed child care provider of his or her child, if the employee, prior to taking the time off, gives reasonable notice to the employer of the planned absence of the employee. Time off pursuant to this subparagraph shall not exceed eight hours in any calendar month of the year.

(B) To address a child care provider or school emergency, if the employee gives notice to the employer.

(2) If
 more than one parent of a child is employed by the same employer at the same worksite, the entitlement under paragraph (1) of a planned absence as to that child applies, at any one time, only to the parent who first gives notice to the employer, such that another parent may take a planned absence simultaneously as to that same child under the conditions described in paragraph (1) only if he or she obtains the employer’s approval for the requested time off.

(b) (1) The employee shall utilize existing vacation, personal leave, or compensatory time off for purposes of the planned absence authorized by this section, unless otherwise provided by a collective bargaining agreement entered into before January 1, 1995, and in effect on that date. An employee also may utilize time off without pay for this purpose, to the extent made available by his or her employer. The entitlement of any employee under this section shall not be diminished by any collective bargaining agreement term or condition that is agreed to on or after January 1, 1995.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), in the event that all permanent, full-time employees of an employer are accorded vacation during the same period of time in the calendar year, an employee of that employer may not utilize that
 accrued vacation benefit at any other time for purposes of the planned absence authorized by this section.

(c) The employee, if requested by the employer, shall provide documentation from the school or licensed child care provider as proof that he or she engaged in child-related activities permitted in subdivision (a) on a specific date and at a particular time. For purposes of this subdivision, “documentation” means whatever written verification of parental participation the school or licensed child care provider deems appropriate and reasonable.

(d) Any employee who is discharged, threatened with discharge, demoted, suspended, or in any other manner discriminated against in terms and conditions of employment by his or her employer because the employee has taken time off to
 engage in child-related activities permitted in subdivision (a) shall be entitled to reinstatement and reimbursement for lost wages and work benefits caused by the acts of the employer. Any employer who willfully refuses to rehire, promote, or otherwise restore an employee or former employee who has been determined to be eligible for rehiring or promotion by a grievance procedure, arbitration, or hearing authorized by law shall be subject to a civil penalty in an amount equal to three times the amount of the employee’s lost wages and work benefits.

(e) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Parent” means a parent, guardian, stepparent, foster parent, or grandparent of, or a person who stands in loco parentis to, a child.

(2) “Child care provider or school emergency” means that an employee’s child cannot remain in a school or with a child care provider due to one of the following:

(A) The school or child care provider has requested that the child be picked up,
 or has an attendance policy, excluding planned holidays, that prohibits the child from attending or requires the child to be picked up from the school or child care provider.

(B) Behavioral or discipline problems.

(C) Closure or unexpected unavailability of the school or child care
 provider, excluding planned holidays.

(D) A natural disaster, including, but not limited to, fire, earthquake, or flood.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 802, Sec. 1.   (SB 579)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

231.

Any employer who requires, as a condition of employment, that an employee have a driver’s license shall pay the cost of any physical examination of the employee which may be required for issuance of such license, except where the physical examination was taken prior to the time the employee applied for such employment with the employer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1279.)
-------------------------------------------

232.

No employer may do any of the following:

(a) Require, as a condition of employment, that an employee refrain from disclosing the amount of his or her wages.

(b) Require an employee to sign a waiver or other document that purports to deny the employee the right to disclose the amount of his or her wages.

(c) Discharge, formally discipline, or otherwise discriminate against an employee who discloses the amount of his or her wages.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 934, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

232.5.

No employer may do any of the following:

(a) Require, as a condition of employment, that an employee refrain from disclosing information about the employer’s working conditions.

(b) Require an employee to sign a waiver or other document that purports to deny the employee the right to disclose information about the employer’s working conditions.

(c) Discharge, formally discipline, or otherwise discriminate against an employee who discloses information about the employer’s working conditions.

(d) This section is not intended to permit an employee to disclose proprietary information, trade secret information, or information that is otherwise subject to a legal privilege without the consent of his or her employer.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 934, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

233.

(a) Any employer who provides sick leave for employees shall permit an employee to use in any calendar year the employee’s accrued and available sick leave entitlement, in an amount not less than the sick leave that would be accrued during six months at the employee’s then current rate of entitlement, for the reasons specified in subdivision (a) of Section 246.5. The designation of sick leave taken for these reasons shall be made at the sole discretion of the employee. This section does not extend the maximum period of leave to which an employee is entitled under Section 12945.2 of the Government Code or under the federal Family and Medical Leave Act of 1993 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 2601 et seq.), regardless of whether the
 employee receives sick leave compensation during that leave.

(b) As used in this section:

(1) “Employer” means any person employing another under any appointment or contract of hire and includes the state, political subdivisions of the state, and municipalities.

(2) “Family member” has the same meaning as defined in Section 245.5.

(3) (A) “Sick leave” means accrued increments of compensated leave provided by an employer to an employee as a benefit of the employment for use by the employee during an absence from the employment for any of the reasons specified in subdivision (a) of Section 246.5.

(B) “Sick leave” does not include any benefit provided under an employee
 welfare benefit plan subject to the federal Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974 (Public Law 93-406, as amended) and does not include any insurance benefit, workers’ compensation benefit, unemployment compensation disability benefit, or benefit not payable from the employer’s general assets.

(c) An employer shall not deny an employee the right to use sick leave or discharge, threaten to discharge, demote, suspend, or in any manner discriminate against an employee for using, or attempting to exercise the right to use, sick leave to attend to an illness or the preventive care of a family member, or for any other reason specified in subdivision (a) of Section 246.5.

(d) Any employee aggrieved by a violation of this section shall be entitled to reinstatement and actual damages or one day’s pay, whichever is greater, and to appropriate equitable relief.

(e) Upon the filing of a complaint by an employee, the Labor Commissioner shall enforce this section in accordance with Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 79) of Division 1, including, but not limited to, Sections 92, 96.7, 98, and 98.1 to 98.8, inclusive. Alternatively, an employee may bring a civil action for the remedies provided by this section in a court of competent jurisdiction. If the employee prevails, the court may award reasonable attorney’s fees.

(f) The rights and remedies specified in this section are cumulative and nonexclusive and are in addition to any other rights or remedies afforded by contract or under other law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 211, Sec. 1.   (AB 2017)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

234.

An employer absence control policy that counts sick leave taken pursuant to Section 233 as an absence that may lead to or result in discipline, discharge, demotion, or suspension is a per se violation of Section 233. An employee working under this policy is entitled to appropriate legal and equitable relief pursuant to Section 233.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1107, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

238.

(a) If a final judgment against an employer arising from the employer’s nonpayment of wages for work performed in this state remains unsatisfied after a period of 30 days after the time to appeal therefrom has expired and no appeal therefrom is pending, the employer shall not continue to conduct business in this state, including conducting business using the labor of another business, contractor, or subcontractor instead of the labor of an employee, unless the employer has obtained a bond from a surety company admitted to do business in this state and has filed a copy of that bond with the Labor Commissioner. The bond shall be effective and maintained until satisfaction of all judgments for nonpayment of wages. The principal sum of the bond shall not be less than the
 following:

(1) Fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) if the unsatisfied portion of the judgment is no more than five thousand dollars ($5,000).

(2) One hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) if the unsatisfied portion of the judgment is more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) and no more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

(3) One hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) if the unsatisfied portion of the judgment is more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

(b) In lieu of filing and maintaining the bond required by this section, the employer may provide the Labor Commissioner with a notarized copy of an accord reached with an individual holding an unsatisfied final judgment. If the accord provides for the judgment to be paid in installments, and an
 installment payment is not made, the employer is no longer excused from satisfying the bond requirement of this section.

(c) (1) The bond required by this section shall be in favor of, and payable to, the people of the State of California, and shall be for the benefit of any employee damaged by his or her employer’s failure to pay wages, including any interest, penalties, and attorney’s fees.

(2) This section shall not require a bond in favor of employees covered by a bona fide collective bargaining agreement, if the agreement expressly provides for wages, hours of work, working conditions, a process to resolve disputes concerning nonpayment of wages, and a waiver of the bond required by this section. 

(3) Thirty days prior to the cancellation or termination of any bond required by this section,
 the surety shall send written notice to both the employer and the Labor Commissioner, identifying the bond and the date of the cancellation or termination. If the bond is terminated or canceled, the employer shall obtain a new surety bond and file a copy of that bond with the Labor Commissioner to remain in compliance with this section.

(d) For purposes of this section, a judgment also includes any final arbitration award where the time to file a petition for a trial de novo or a petition to vacate or correct the arbitration award has expired and no petition is pending.

(e) Subject to subdivision (f), an employer similar in operation and ownership to an employer with an unsatisfied final judgment for unpaid wages, upon receiving written notice of the unsatisfied judgment, shall be deemed the same employer for purposes of this
 section if (1) the employees of the successor employer are engaged in substantially the same work in substantially the same working conditions under substantially the same supervisors or (2) if the new entity has substantially the same production process or operations, produces substantially the same products or offers substantially the same services, and has substantially the same body of customers.

(f) Any employer, or other person acting on behalf of an employer, that conducts business in violation of this section shall be subject to a civil penalty of two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500). Any employer that has previously been assessed and failed to pay a penalty pursuant to this section shall be subject to an additional penalty of one hundred dollars ($100) for each calendar day that the employer conducts business in violation of this section; however, this additional amount shall not exceed one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000).
 These civil penalties may be assessed under a citation issued by the Labor Commissioner and the procedures for issuing, contesting, and enforcing judgments shall be the same as those set forth in Section 1197.1. The Labor Commissioner shall not assess these civil penalties against an entity determined to be a successor employer pursuant to subdivision (e) within the first 30 days after notice of the judgment.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 803, Sec. 4.   (SB 588)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

238.05.

(a) If a final judgment arising from nonpayment of wages for work performed in this state remains unsatisfied after a period of 180 days after the time to appeal therefrom has expired and no appeal therefrom is pending, the judgment debtor shall be subject to a civil penalty not to exceed three times the outstanding judgment amount, including postjudgment interest
 then due, provided that a judgment debtor shall not be subject to a penalty under this subdivision if the judgment debtor reaches an accord described in subdivision (b) of Section 238 before the 180th day and then remains in full compliance with the accord until its full satisfaction. The court may assess this penalty in any action brought to enforce the judgment or to otherwise induce compliance by or impose lawful consequences on a judgment debtor.

(b) In any action brought to
 enforce the judgment or to otherwise induce compliance by or impose lawful consequences on a judgment debtor, the court shall assess against the judgment debtor the entire amount of the requested penalty except to the extent that the court finds that the judgment debtor has demonstrated by clear and convincing evidence good cause to reduce the amount of the penalty.

(c) Penalties assessed by a court pursuant to this section shall be distributed as follows:

(1) Fifty percent to the employee or employees in whose favor the judgment was rendered, shared proportionally according to the amount due to each employee in the judgment entered in superior court.

(2) Fifty percent to the Division of Labor Standards Enforcement for enforcement of labor laws, including the administration of this part, and for education of employers and employees about their rights and responsibilities under this code, upon appropriation, to supplement and not supplant the funding to the division for those purposes.

(d) A successor to a judgment debtor, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 200.3 or by any other law, shall be jointly and severally liable for penalties assessed pursuant to this section.

(e) Penalties assessed pursuant to this section shall be in addition to any other penalties or fines permitted by law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 747, Sec. 3.   (SB 261)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

238.10.

The court shall award a prevailing plaintiff all reasonable attorney’s fees and costs in any action brought by a judgment creditor, the Labor Commissioner, or a public prosecutor, as defined in Section 180, to enforce a final judgment arising from the nonpayment of wages, penalties, or other amounts owed arising from work performed in this state, or to otherwise induce compliance by or
 impose lawful consequences on a judgment debtor for nonsatisfaction of a final judgment arising from the
 nonpayment of wages, penalties, or other amounts owed arising from work performed in this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 747, Sec. 4.   (SB 261)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

238.1.

(a) Where an employer is conducting business in violation of Section 238, the Labor Commissioner may issue and serve on that employer a stop order prohibiting the use of employee labor by that employer until the employer’s compliance with Section 238, provided that the stop order would not compromise or imperil public safety or the life, health, and care of vulnerable individuals. The stop order shall also prohibit the employer from continuing to provide services by conducting business using the labor of another business, contractor, or subcontractor. The stop order shall become effective immediately upon the service of the order. Any employee affected by the work stoppage shall be paid by the employer for such time lost, not exceeding 10 days, pending compliance by
 the employer. The employer may protest the stop order by making and filing with the Labor Commissioner a written request for a hearing within 20 days after service of the stop order. The hearing shall be held within five days from the date of filing the request. The Labor Commissioner shall notify the employer of the time and place of the hearing by mail. At the conclusion of the hearing, the stop order shall be immediately affirmed or dismissed, and within 24 hours thereafter, the Labor Commissioner shall issue and serve on all parties to the hearing by registered or certified mail a written notice of findings, accompanied by written findings. A writ of mandate may be taken from the findings to the appropriate superior court. The writ shall be taken within 45 days after the mailing of the notice of findings accompanied by written findings. The Labor Commissioner may file an action in superior court for injunctive and other appropriate relief to enforce the stop order and shall be entitled to recovery of
 costs and attorney’s fees if any relief is obtained by the Labor Commissioner.

(b) Failure of an employer, owner, director, officer, or managing agent of the employer to observe a stop order issued and served upon him or her pursuant to this section is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment in county jail not exceeding 60 days or by a fine not exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or both. For the purposes of this section, the term “managing agent” has the same meaning as in subdivision (b) of Section 3294 of the Civil Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 803, Sec. 5.   (SB 588)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

238.2.

(a) The Labor Commissioner may create a lien on any real property in California of an employer, or a successor employer pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 238, that is conducting business in violation of Section 238 for the full amount of any wages, interest, and penalties claimed to be owed to any employee. To the extent attorney’s fees are specifically allowed to be recovered by this code, such as by, but not limited to, subdivision (f) of Section 2673.1 and Section 2802, during a hearing pursuant to Section 98, the Labor Commissioner may include that amount in the lien.

(b) The Labor Commissioner may create the lien provided in this section by recording a certificate of lien using the same
 procedure applicable under subdivision (g) of Section 98.2.

(c) The Labor Commissioner shall issue a certificate of release, releasing the lien created under this section, upon final satisfaction of any judgment entered in favor of the employee, upon adjudication of the claim in favor of the employer, upon the filing of a surety bond pursuant to Section 238. The certificate of release may be recorded by the employer at the employer’s expense.

(d) Unless the lien is satisfied or released, a lien under this section shall continue until 10 years from the date of its creation.

(e) Prior to using the lien procedure in this section, the Labor Commissioner shall provide at least 20 days’ notice to the employer. The notice shall advise the employer of the Labor Commissioner’s authority to create a lien on the property to
 secure payment of the claim.

(f) The Labor Commissioner may serve the notice with and in the same manner as the order, decision, and award in accordance with Section 98.1.

(g) A lien created pursuant to this section is in addition to any other lien rights available to an employee or to the Labor Commissioner and shall not be construed to limit those rights.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 803, Sec. 6.   (SB 588)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

238.3.

(a) The Labor Commissioner may create a lien on any personal property in California of an employer that conducts business in violation of Section 238 for the full amount of any wages, interest, and penalties claimed to be owed to any employee. To the extent attorney’s fees are specifically allowed to be recovered by this code, such as by, but not limited to, subdivision (f) of Section 2673.1 and Section 2802, during a hearing pursuant to Section 98, the Labor Commissioner may include that amount in the lien.

(b) The Labor Commissioner may create the lien provided in this section by filing a notice of lien with the Secretary of State on the standard form of initial financing statement pursuant to Section
 9521 of the Commercial Code. The standard form shall be completed in the following manner:

(1) The Labor Commissioner shall be identified as the secured party.

(2) The employer shall be identified as the debtor.

(3) The description of the collateral shall include the following statements:

(A) A statement of the Labor Commissioner’s demand for payment of the wages, penalties, interest, and attorney’s fees, if applicable. The statement shall specify the amount owed to the employee, and if the amount is estimated, shall provide an explanation for the basis of the estimate.

(B) A general statement of the kind of work furnished by the employee and the dates of employment.

(c) For the purpose of the Secretary of State’s index pursuant to Sections 9515, 9516, and 9522 of the Commercial Code and for the purpose of the issuance of a certificate pursuant to Section 9519 or 9528 of the Commercial Code, the Secretary of State shall treat a notice of lien pursuant to this section as a financing statement.

(d) The lien attaches to all personal property that is owned by the employer at the time of the filing of the notice of lien, or that is subsequently acquired by the employer, that can be made subject to a security interest under the Commercial Code.

(e) The Labor Commissioner shall file a termination statement, releasing the lien created under this section, upon final satisfaction of any judgment entered in favor of the employee, upon adjudication of the claim in favor of the employer, upon
 the filing of a surety bond in a form acceptable to the Labor Commissioner sufficient to secure the claim.

(f) The notice of claim of lien to which the termination statement relates ceases to be effective upon the filing of a termination statement with the office of the Secretary of State. A termination statement for a notice of lien may be filed in the same manner as a termination statement for a financing statement filed pursuant to Section 9513 of the Commercial Code.

(g) Unless the lien is satisfied or released, a lien under this section shall continue until 10 years from the date of its creation.

(h) Prior to using this lien procedure in this section, the Labor Commissioner shall provide at least 20 days’ preliminary notice to the employer. The preliminary notice shall advise the employer of the nature and
 amount of the employee’s claim and of the Labor Commissioner’s authority to create a lien on the employer’s personal property to secure payment of the claim.

(i) The Labor Commissioner shall serve the preliminary notice on the employer by certified mail with return receipt requested, evidenced by a certificate of mailing, postage prepaid, addressed to the employer at the employer’s residence or place of business. The Labor Commissioner shall serve a copy of any notice of lien on the employer in the same manner.

(j) Upon entry of a final order, decision, or award issued in an appeal pursuant to Section 98.2 against the employer for unpaid wages, or entry of a final judgment against the employer for unpaid wages in an action filed in the superior court, the Labor Commissioner may bring an action to foreclose on any lien created pursuant to this section.

(k) A lien created pursuant to this section in addition to any other lien rights available to an employee or to the Labor Commissioner shall not be construed to limit those rights.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 803, Sec. 7.   (SB 588)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

238.4.

(a) If an employer in the long-term care industry that is also required to obtain a license from the State Department of Public Health or the State Department of Social Services pursuant to Division 2 (commencing with Section 1200) of the Health and Safety Code, is found to be in violation of Section 238, the State Department of Public Health or the State Department of Social Services may deny a new license or the renewal of an existing license for that employer.

(b) If the Labor Commissioner finds that an employer in the long-term care industry is conducting business in violation of Section 238, the Labor Commissioner shall notify the State Department of Public Health or the State Department of Social
 Services.

 (c) For purposes of this section “long-term care” means the operation of a skilled nursing facility, intermediate care facility, congregate living health facility, hospice facility, adult residential facility, residential care facility for persons with chronic life-threatening illness, residential care facility for the elderly, continuing care retirement community, home health agency, or home care organization, as those terms are used in Division 2 (commencing with Section 1200) of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 803, Sec. 8.   (SB 588)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

238.5.

(a) (1) Any individual, business entity, or public entity, regardless of its form, that, as part of its business, contracts for services in the property services or long-term care industries shall be jointly and severally liable for any unpaid wages, including interest, where the individual, business entity, or public entity has been provided notice, by any party, of any proceeding or investigation by the Labor Commissioner in which the employer is found liable for those unpaid wages, to the extent the amounts are for services performed under that contract.

(2) The issue of joint and several liability under this section shall be determined (A) in a proceeding under Section
 98 if the contracting individual, business entity, or public entity is provided notice in the administrative complaint alleging such liability and named a defendant in the course of the Section 98 proceeding, (B) in an administrative proceeding brought by the Labor Commissioner to investigate, prosecute, or recover unpaid wages and interest pursuant to a citation, or in a court action brought by the Labor Commissioner, if the contracting individual, business entity, or public entity is provided preliminary notice by the Labor Commissioner of joint and several liability under this section at least 30 days prior to issuance of a citation, or filing of a court action, or (C) by a court in an action pursuant to Section 98.2. No action for a violation or enforcement of this section shall be brought under Part 13 (commencing with Section 2698) of Division 2.

(b) The joint and several liability provided by this section shall not apply to unpaid wages owed to employees covered by a bona fide collective bargaining agreement, if the agreement expressly provides for wages, hours of work, working conditions, a process to resolve disputes concerning nonpayment of wages, and a waiver of the joint and several liability provided by this section.

(c) An employer that contracts to provide services in the property services or long-term care industries shall, before entering into such a contract, provide written notice to the other party to the prospective contract of any unsatisfied final judgments against the employer for nonpayment of wages. The notice shall also provide the text of this section. The failure of the employer to provide notice under this subdivision shall not be a defense to the joint
 and several liability provided by this section.

(d) An employer that contracts to provide services in the property services or long-term care industries shall provide, within 30 days of the entry of the judgment, written notice of any unsatisfied final judgments against the employer for nonpayment of wages to any parties with which the employer is presently under contract to provide services in the property services or long-term care industries. The failure of the employer to provide notice under this subdivision shall not be a defense to the joint and several liability provided by this section.

(e) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Property services” means janitorial, security
 guard, valet parking, landscaping, and gardening services.

(2) “Long-term care” has the same definition as in Section 238.4.

(3) “Public entity” means a city, county, city and county, district, public authority, public agency, and any other political subdivision or public corporation in the state, but does not include the state.

(f) This section shall not be interpreted to impose joint liability on an individual or the owner of a home-based business, for any property
 services, to the extent that the property services are provided at the individual or home-based business owner’s primary residence, provided that the primary residence does not have multiple housing units.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 656, Sec. 1.   (AB 520)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

240.

(a) If any employer has been convicted of a violation of any provision of this article, or if any judgment against an employer for nonpayment of wages remains unsatisfied for a period of 10 days after the time to appeal therefrom has expired, and no appeal therefrom is then pending, the Labor Commissioner may require the employer to deposit a bond in such sum as the Labor Commissioner may deem sufficient and adequate in the circumstances, to be approved by the Labor Commissioner. The bond shall be payable to the Labor Commissioner and shall be conditioned that the employer shall, for a definite future period, not exceeding two years, pay the employees in accordance with the provisions of this article, and shall be further conditioned upon the
 payment by the employer of any judgment which may be recovered against the employer pursuant to the provisions of this article.

(b) If an order to post a bond issued against an employer under this section remains unsatisfied for a period of 10 days after the time to appeal therefrom has expired, and no appeal from the order is then pending, the Labor Commissioner may require the employer to provide an accounting of assets of the employer, including a list of all bank accounts, accounts receivable, personal property, real property, automobiles or other vehicles, and any other assets, in a form and manner as prescribed by the Labor Commissioner. An employer shall provide an amended accounting of assets, if ordered by the Labor Commissioner to do so. If, within 10 days after a demand for an accounting of assets, made by certified or registered mail, the employer fails to provide an accounting, or if the employer fails to provide an amended
 accounting after receiving a demand by the Labor Commissioner to do so, the Labor Commissioner may bring an action in the name and on behalf of the people of the State of California against such employer to compel the employer to furnish the accounting. An employer who fails to provide an accounting as required by this subdivision shall be subject to a civil penalty not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

(c) If, within 10 days after demand for the bond, which demand may be made by mail, the employer fails to deposit the bond, the Labor Commissioner may bring an action in the name and on behalf of the people of the State of California against the employer in a court of competent jurisdiction to compel the employer to furnish the bond or to cease doing business until the employer has done so. The employer has the burden of proving either that the bond is unnecessary or that the amount demanded is excessive. If the court finds that there is
 just cause for requiring the bond, and that the bond is reasonably necessary or proper to secure prompt payment of the wages of the employees of the employer and the employer’s compliance with the provisions of this article, the court may enjoin the employer, whether an individual, partnership, corporation, company, trust, or association, and such other person or persons as may have been or may be concerned with or in any way participating in the failure to pay the wages resulting in the conviction or in the judgment, from doing business until the requirement is met, and make other and further orders appropriate to compel compliance with the requirement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 655, Sec. 5.   (AB 469)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

243.

(a) If, within 10 years of either a conviction for a violation of this article or failing to satisfy a judgment for nonpayment of wages, or of both, it is alleged that an employer on a second occasion has been convicted of again violating this article or is failing to satisfy a judgment for nonpayment of wages, an employee or the employee’s legal representative, an attorney licensed to practice law in this state, may, on behalf of himself or herself and others, bring an action in a court of competent jurisdiction for a temporary restraining order prohibiting the employer from doing business in this state unless the employer deposits with the court a bond to secure compliance by the employer with this article or to satisfy the judgment for nonpayment
 of wages.

(b) Upon the filing of an affidavit that, to the satisfaction of the court, shows reasonable proof that an employer, for the second time within 10 years, has been convicted of violating this article or has failed to satisfy a judgment for the nonpayment of wages, or both, the court may grant an order that prohibits the employer within 30 days from conducting any business within the state unless the employer deposits a bond payable to the Labor Commissioner, with the condition that the employer make wage payments in accordance with this article, or that the employer pay any unsatisfied judgment for nonpayment of wages, or both. The court shall order that the bond be on deposit with the Labor Commissioner at all times within a five-year period from the date of the order, that the employer employs more than 10 employees. The court shall order that the bond be in an amount equal to twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) or 25 percent of